Virginia statutes. Title 52. Police (State).
Chapter 6.1. Virginia Community Policing Act.

§ 52-30.1.
Definition.

For purposes of this chapter, unless the context requires a different meaning, “bias-based profiling” means actions of a law-enforcement officer that are based solely on the real or perceived race, ethnicity, age, gender, or any combination thereof, or other noncriminal characteristics of an individual, except when such characteristics are used in combination with other identifying factors in seeking to apprehend a suspect who matches a specific description.

History.

2020, c. 1165.

§ 52-30.2.
Prohibited practices; collection of data.

No State Police officer shall engage in bias-based profiling in the performance of his official duties.

State Police officers shall collect data pertaining to (i) all investigatory motor vehicle stops, (ii) all stop-and-frisks of a person based on reasonable suspicion, and (iii) all other investigatory detentions that do not result in an arrest or the issuance of a summons to be reported into the Community Policing Reporting Database. State Police officers shall submit the data to their commanding officers, who shall forward it to the Superintendent of State Police.

Each time a law-enforcement officer or State Police officer stops a driver of a motor vehicle, stops and frisks a person based on reasonable suspicion, or temporarily detains a person during any other investigatory stop, such officer shall collect the following data based on the officer’s observation or information provided to the officer by the driver: (i) the race, ethnicity, age, gender of the person stopped, and whether the person stopped spoke English; (ii) the reason for the stop; (iii) the location of the stop; (iv) whether a warning, written citation, or summons was issued or whether any person was arrested; (v) if a warning, written citation, or summons was issued or an arrest was made, the warning provided, violation charged, or crime charged; (vi) whether the vehicle or any person was searched; and (vii) whether the law-enforcement officer or State Police officer used physical force against any person and whether any person used physical force against any officers.

Each state and local law-enforcement agency shall collect the number of complaints the agency receives alleging the use of excessive force.

History.

2020, c. 1165; 2020, Sp. Sess. I, c. 37.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, Sp. Sess. I, c. 37, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act may result in a net increase in periods of imprisonment or commitment. Pursuant to § 30-19.1:4 of the Code of Virginia, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation cannot be determined for periods of imprisonment in state adult correctional facilities; therefore, Chapter 1289 of the Acts of Assembly of 2020 requires the Virginia Criminal Sentencing Commission to assign a minimum fiscal impact of $50,000. Pursuant to § 30-19.1:4 of the Code of Virginia, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation is $0 for periods of commitment to the custody of the Department of Juvenile Justice.”

Acts 2020, Sp. Sess. I, c. 37, cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of §§

15.2-1609.10

,

15.2-1722.1

,

52-30.2

,

52-30.3

, and

52-30.4

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, shall become effective on July 1, 2021.”

The 2020 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2020 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 37, effective July 1, 2021, rewrote the first sentence in subsection B, which formerly read: “State Police officers shall collect data pertaining to motor vehicle or investigatory stops to be reported into the Community Policing Reporting Database.”; and, in subsection C, inserted “stops and frisks a person based on reasonable suspicion, or temporarily detains a person during any other investigatory stop,” added “and whether the person stopped spoke English” at the end of clause (i), added clause (vii) and made related changes.

§ 52-30.3.
Community Policing Reporting Database established.

The Department of State Police shall develop and implement a uniform statewide database to collect all records of investigatory motor vehicle stops, all stop-and-frisks of a person based on reasonable suspicion, and other investigatory detentions that do not result in an arrest or the issuance of a summons, records of complaints alleging the use of excessive force, and data and information submitted by law-enforcement agencies pursuant to §§

15.2-1609.10

,

15.2-1722.1

, and

52-30.2

. The Department of State Police shall provide the Department of Criminal Justice Services with secure remote access to the database for the purposes of analyzing such data as required by subsection A of §

9.1-192

.

The Department of State Police shall promulgate regulations governing the operation and maintenance of the database.

History.

2020, c. 1165; 2020 Sp. Sess. I, c. 37.

Editor’s note.

At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, ‘§

9.1-192

‘ was substituted for ‘§

9.1-191

‘ at the end of this section to conform to the renumbering of that section. Also, the subsection A designation was deleted at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission since there was no subsection B.

Acts 2020, Sp. Sess. I, c. 37, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act may result in a net increase in periods of imprisonment or commitment. Pursuant to § 30-19.1:4 of the Code of Virginia, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation cannot be determined for periods of imprisonment in state adult correctional facilities; therefore, Chapter 1289 of the Acts of Assembly of 2020 requires the Virginia Criminal Sentencing Commission to assign a minimum fiscal impact of $50,000. Pursuant to § 30-19.1:4 of the Code of Virginia, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation is $0 for periods of commitment to the custody of the Department of Juvenile Justice.”

Acts 2020, Sp. Sess. I, c. 37, cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of §§

15.2-1609.10

,

15.2-1722.1

,

52-30.2

,

52-30.3

, and

52-30.4

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, shall become effective on July 1, 2021.”

The 2020 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2020 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 37, effective July 1, 2021, added the subsection A designation; substituted “all records of investigatory motor vehicle stops, all stop-and-frisks of a person based on reasonable suspicion, and other investigatory detentions that do not result in an arrest or the issuance of a summons” for “motor vehicle and investigatory stop records” in subsection A; and added subsection B.

§ 52-30.4.
Reporting of state and local law-enforcement agencies required.

All state and local law-enforcement agencies shall collect the data specified in subsections C and D of §

52-30.2

, and any other data as may be specified by the Department of State Police, on forms developed by the Department of State Police and submit such data to the Department of State Police for inclusion in the Community Policing Reporting Database.

History.

2020, c. 1165; 2020, Sp. Sess. I, c. 37.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, Sp. Sess. I, c. 37, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act may result in a net increase in periods of imprisonment or commitment. Pursuant to § 30-19.1:4 of the Code of Virginia, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation cannot be determined for periods of imprisonment in state adult correctional facilities; therefore, Chapter 1289 of the Acts of Assembly of 2020 requires the Virginia Criminal Sentencing Commission to assign a minimum fiscal impact of $50,000. Pursuant to § 30-19.1:4 of the Code of Virginia, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation is $0 for periods of commitment to the custody of the Department of Juvenile Justice.”

Acts 2020, Sp. Sess. I, c. 37, cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of §§

15.2-1609.10

,

15.2-1722.1

,

52-30.2

,

52-30.3

, and

52-30.4

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, shall become effective on July 1, 2021.”

The 2020 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2020 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 37, effective July 1, 2021, added “and submit such data to the Department of State Police for inclusion in the Community Policing Reporting Database” at the end of the paragraph.